Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 25. Appropriations.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The provisions of AS

37.25.010

and

37.25.020

regarding unexpended balances of appropriations are applicable to the University of Alaska.
February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

There is no constitutional obstacle to making the University of Alaska subject to the provisions contained in this title. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.25.010.
Unexpended balances of one-year appropriations.

The unexpended balance of a one-year appropriation authorized in an appropriation bill lapses on June 30 of the fiscal year for which appropriated. However, a valid obligation (encumbrance) existing on June 30 is automatically reappropriated for the fiscal year beginning on the succeeding July 1 if it is recorded with the Department of Administration by August 31 of the succeeding fiscal year.

A valid approved claim arising from a prior year for which the appropriation has lapsed shall be paid from the current year’s appropriations if this claim does not exceed the balance lapsed.

University receipts received on or before June 30 of a fiscal year in excess of the amount expended for that year may be expended in the succeeding fiscal year if an appropriation of university receipts has been made for the succeeding fiscal year. The amount of university receipts expended in a fiscal year may not exceed the amount of university receipts appropriated for that year.

The University of Alaska shall, in the report required under AS

14.40.190(a)

, report the amount of university receipts received in one year and expended in the succeeding fiscal year.

In this section, “university receipts” has the meaning given in AS

14.40.491

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1962; am § 8 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 98 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For nonapplicability of this section to appropriations for the operation of the state boarding school, see AS

14.16.080(c)

.

Sec. 37.25.020.
Unexpended balances of appropriation for capital projects.

An appropriation made for a capital project is valid for the life of the project, and the unexpended balance shall be carried forward to subsequent fiscal years if substantial, ongoing work on the project has begun within five years after the effective date of the appropriation. Between July 1 and August 31 of each fiscal year, a statement supporting the amount of the unexpended balance required to complete the projects for which the initial appropriation was made and the amount that may be lapsed shall be recorded with the Department of Administration. The office of management and budget, in coordination with the Department of Administration, shall deliver to the house and senate finance committees a report of unexpended balances of appropriations for capital projects not later than the 15th day of each regular session of the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Appropriations that are available for expenditure in a fiscal year should be counted only against the appropriation limit of
§ 16, art. IX, of the state constitution, for the first fiscal year during which they could be completely expended, even if an unexpended balance is carried forward into the next fiscal year.
1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

An appropriation may be identified as a capital appropriation for purposes of AS

37.05.020

though it is not specifically identified as such. If the appropriation is for a project that is clearly a capital improvement, then it should be treated as a capital appropriation governed by that section. The fact that certain sections in the bill at hand were not included in the section of the bill identifying certain appropriations as capital and subject to the lapsing rules AS

37.05.020

, which exclusion was an apparent oversight, did not alter their character as capital appropriations. June 17, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.25.030.
Appropriations for projects of the Alaska energy center. [Repealed, § 65 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 37.25.040.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.530.]

Sec. 37.25.050.
Methods of disbursement.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, unless federal law requires otherwise, a state agency may not disburse money unless the disbursement is made

by an electronic funds transfer to an account in a financial institution; or

from an account established by the state agency by contract with a financial institution under which a person uses an electronic payment card issued by the financial institution to access the money.

A state agency is not required to use the disbursement methods described in (a) of the section if

another state law or federal law requires that disbursement be made by another disbursement method;

use of the disbursement methods would cause substantial hardship to the recipient of the disbursement;

not more than five disbursements will be made to a recipient, or, on average, to each recipient entitled to disbursement under the program for which the disbursements are made;

a vendor or grantee elects not to be paid by the disbursement methods;

the disbursement is to a state employee and

is the only disbursement that the state agency will make to the employee for the employment; or

it is in the best interests of the state agency or the employee to use another disbursement method to pay the employee; or

use of another disbursement method is in the best interests of the state agency.

The commissioner of administration shall adopt regulations to implement (b) of this section.

A state agency is not liable to pay a fee imposed by a recipient’s financial institution for a disbursement made under (a) of this section.

In this section,

“disbursement” includes wages and other employment benefits;

“state agency” means a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, committee, or other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government, including the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 20 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For purchasing, see 2 AAC 15.